Missouri, session 2026, HB2985.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 571, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 571.201, to read as follows:
571.201. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Central repository", the same meaning given to the term in section 43.500;
(2) "Law enforcement officer", any individual employed by the United States or
by a state, county, city, municipality, village, township, or other political subdivision as a
police officer or peace officer or in a similar position that involves the enforcement of
the law and protection of the public interest;
(3) "Licensed dealer", a person who has a valid federal firearms dealer license
and all additional licenses required by state or local law to engage in the business of
selling or transferring firearms;
(4) "Person", any individual, corporation, company, association, firm,
partnership, club, organization, society, joint stock company, or other entity;
(5) "Transferee", a person who desires to receive or acquire a firearm from a
transferor. If a transferee is not a natural person, each natural person who is
authorized by the transferee to possess the firearm after the transfer shall be deemed
the transferee and subject to the requirements of this section.
2. Any person who is not a licensed dealer, before transferring or attempting to
transfer possession of a firearm, shall require that a background check be conducted on
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2985 2
the prospective transferee and shall obtain approval of the transfer from the central
repository after a background check. A person who is not a licensed dealer shall
arrange for either a licensed dealer or law enforcement agency to obtain the background
check.
3. (1) A licensed dealer who obtains a background check on a prospective
transferee shall record the transfer and retain the records in the same manner and for
the same duration as required under 18 U.S.C. Section 923(g).
(2) A licensed dealer or law enforcement agency that obtains a background
check for a prospective firearm transferor shall provide the firearm transferor and
transferee a copy of the results of the background check, including the central
repository approval or disapproval of the transfer.
(3) A licensed dealer or law enforcement agency may charge a fee for conducting
a background check, which shall not exceed twenty-five dollars or the cost of conducting
the background check, whichever is greater.
4. (1) A prospective firearm transferee shall not accept possession of a firearm
unless the prospective firearm transferor has obtained approval of the transfer from the
central repository after a background check.
(2) A prospective firearm transferee shall not knowingly provide false
information to a prospective firearm transferor or to a licensed dealer for the
purpose of acquiring a firearm.
5. If the central repository approves a transfer of a firearm in accordance with
this section, the approval shall be valid for thirty calendar days, during which time the
transferor and transferee may complete the transfer.
6. The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(1) A transfer of an antique firearm, as defined in 18 U.S.C. Section 921, as
amended, or a curio or relic, as defined in 27 CFR 478, as amended;
(2) A transfer that is a bona fide gift or loan between immediate family
members, which shall be limited to spouses, parents, children, siblings, grandparents,
grandchildren, nieces, nephews, first cousins, aunts, and uncles;
(3) A transfer that occurs by operation of law or because of the death of a person
for whom the prospective transferor is an executor or administrator of an estate or a
trustee of a trust created in a will;
(4) A transfer that is temporary and occurs while in the home of the unlicensed
transferee if:
(a) The unlicensed transferee is not prohibited from possessing firearms; and

HB 2985 3
(b) The unlicensed transferee reasonably believes that possession of the firearm
is necessary to prevent imminent death or serious bodily injury to the unlicensed
transferee;
(5) A temporary transfer of possession without transfer of ownership or a title to
ownership, which transfer takes place:
(a) At a shooting range located in or on premises owned or occupied by a duly
incorporated organization organized for conservation purposes or to foster proficiency
in firearms;
(b) At a target firearm shooting competition under the auspices of, or approved
by, a state agency or a nonprofit organization; or
(c) While hunting, fishing, target shooting, or trapping if:
a. The hunting, fishing, target shooting, or trapping is legal in all places where
the unlicensed transferee possesses the firearm; and
b. The unlicensed transferee holds any license or permit that is required for such
hunting, fishing, target shooting, or trapping;
(6) Any temporary transfer that occurs while in the continuous presence of the
owner of the firearm;
(7) Any law enforcement or corrections agency or law enforcement or
corrections officer acting within the course and scope of his or her employment or
official duties;
(8) A United States marshal, a member of the Armed Forces of the United States
or the National Guard, or a federal official transferring or receiving a firearm as
required in the operation of his or her official duties;
(9) A gunsmith who receives a firearm solely for the purposes of service or
repair or the return of the firearm to its owner by the gunsmith;
(10) A common carrier, warehouseman, or other person engaged in the business
of transportation or storage, to the extent that the receipt of any firearm is in the
ordinary course of business and not for the personal use of any such person; or
(11) A person who transfers a firearm to a relative who is related within the first
degree by consanguinity or affinity.
7. A violation of a provision of this section is a class B misdemeanor. Each day a
violation of this section is committed or continued shall be considered a separate
violation and punished accordingly.
8. In addition to any other penalty or remedy, the investigating law enforcement
agency shall report any violation of this section committed by a licensed dealer to the

HB 2985 4
attorney general, who shall report the violation to the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco,
Firearms and Explosives within the United States Department of Justice.
✔